District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2923

Certificate or diploma from national examining board or completion of examination by Federation of State Medical Boards

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(e), 33 DCR 729

History

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343.

Prior Codifications